Massachusetts, session 194th, H3214.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 981 and 982, the words “four 
hundred and thirty-seven dollars” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $1,800. 
SECTION 2. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out, in line 997, the words “five hundred dollars” and inserting in place 
thereof the following figure:- $1,800.